Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1920
Scald prevention device requirements; compliance required.

Nothing in sections 18-1901 to 18-1919 shall be construed to exempt persons from compliance with sections 71-1569 to 71-1571.

Laws 1987, LB 264, § 4.